North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-04 Contributions
52-04-20.
Group accounts.

Two or more employers that have become liable for payments in lieu of contributions may file a joint application to the bureau for the establishment of a group account for the purpose of sharing the cost of benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of such employers. Each such application must identify and authorize a group representative to act as the group’s agent for the purposes of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law. Upon the approval of the application, the bureau shall establish a group account for such employers effective as of the beginning of the calendar quarter in which it receives the application and shall notify the group’s representative of the effective date of the account. Such account must remain in effect for not less than two years and thereafter until terminated at the discretion of the bureau or upon application by the group. Upon establishment of the account, each member of the group is liable for payments in lieu of contributions with respect to each calendar quarter in the amount that bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid in such quarter that are attributable to service performed in the employ of all members of the group as the total wages paid for service in employment by such member in such quarter bear to the total wages paid during such quarter for service performed in the employ of all members of the group. The bureau shall prescribe such regulations as it deems necessary with respect to applications for establishment, maintenance, and termination of group accounts that are authorized by this section, for addition of new members to, and withdrawal of active members from, such accounts, and for the determination of the amounts that are payable under this section by members of the group and the time and manner of such payments.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 475, § 7.

52-04-21.
Advances from federal unemployment trust fund.

The governor is authorized to apply for advances to the state of North Dakota from the federal unemployment trust fund and to accept responsibility for repayment of such advances in accordance with the conditions specified in title XII of the Social Security Act, as amended, in order to secure to this state the advantages available under the provisions of said title.

Advances from the federal unemployment trust fund which are interest-bearing must have such interest cost assessed against and paid from the federal advance interest repayment fund.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 539, § 1.

52-04-21.1.
Advances from certain sources other than federal unemployment trust fund.

Job service North Dakota may borrow funds from the Bank of North Dakota. Job service North Dakota may also receive title XII advances from the federal unemployment trust fund. However, the borrowings and advances may not exceed amounts which are necessary and sufficient to meet payment of unemployment compensation benefits, repayment of title XII advances from the federal unemployment trust fund, and payment of interest on title XII advances from the federal unemployment trust fund. Any such amounts borrowed from the Bank of North Dakota must be repaid no later than the end of the biennium in which they are borrowed. Any such amounts borrowed from the Bank of North Dakota are not indebtedness of the state or of any officer or agent of the state within the meaning of any statutory or constitutional provision. The borrowed funds may be placed in the state unemployment compensation fund or in the federal advance interest repayment fund established under section 52-04-22.

Any such amounts placed in the state unemployment compensation fund may be used to pay unemployment compensation benefits and to repay title XII advances from the federal unemployment trust fund. Any such amounts placed in the federal advance interest repayment fund may be used to pay interest on title XII advances from the federal unemployment trust fund.

Job service North Dakota may repay funds borrowed from the Bank of North Dakota, which are placed in the state unemployment compensation fund, from amounts in the state unemployment compensation fund. Job service North Dakota may also repay funds borrowed from the Bank of North Dakota which are placed in the federal advance interest repayment fund, from amounts in the federal advance interest repayment fund. However, any interest due on any borrowed funds whatsoever may not be paid from amounts in the state unemployment compensation fund. Interest due on such borrowed funds must be paid from the federal advance interest repayment fund.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 597, § 2.

52-04-22.
Federal advance interest repayment fund — Continuing appropriation.

There is created the federal advance interest repayment fund, to which will be credited all assessments collected by the division for the purpose of paying interest due on federal advances to the state trust fund. The fund must consist of all interest collected on delinquent contributions, all penalties provided by the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, and funds borrowed from sources other than federal advances which are placed in this fund. All moneys accruing to this fund in any manner must be maintained in this separate interest-bearing account at the Bank of North Dakota or invested in deposits of the Bank of North Dakota.

Moneys in this fund may also be used for the purpose of repaying funds placed in this fund which are borrowed from sources other than federal advances and for the purpose of paying interest due on other than federal advances.

Moneys in this fund may also be used for the purpose of paying principal and interest costs associated with the acquisition and renovation of land and a building to be used as an office facility by job service North Dakota in Grand Forks, North Dakota. Moneys in this fund also may be used for the purpose of paying principal and interest costs associated with the acquisition and renovation of land and building to be used as an office facility by job service North Dakota in Bismarck, North Dakota. Moneys in this fund also may be used for the purpose of paying building lease costs of office facilities leased by job service North Dakota. Moneys in this fund may be used for the purpose of paying the costs of repair, renovation, or alteration of job service-owned office facilities. Moneys in this fund may be used for the purpose of paying the replacement rate charged for use of state fleet vehicles. Moneys in this fund may be used for the purposes of re-employment programs to ensure the integrity of the unemployment insurance program in this state. Moneys in this fund may be used to administer the unemployment insurance program and may be used to pay expenses incurred by job service North Dakota which are not payable with federal grant or state general funds. Moneys in this fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes specified in this section including the purpose of paying principal and interest costs associated with the acquisition and renovation of land and a building to be used as an office facility by job service North Dakota in Grand Forks, North Dakota. Moneys in this fund are appropriated for the purpose of paying the principal and interest costs associated with the acquisition and renovation of land and a building to be used as an office facility by job service North Dakota in Bismarck, North Dakota. Moneys in this fund are appropriated for the purpose of paying building lease costs of office facilities leased by job service North Dakota. Moneys in this fund are appropriated for the purpose of paying the costs of repair, renovation, or alteration of job service-owned office facilities. Moneys in this fund are appropriated for the purpose of paying the replacement rate charged for use of state fleet vehicles. Moneys in this fund are appropriated for the purposes of re-employment programs to ensure the integrity of the unemployment insurance program in this state. Moneys in this fund are appropriated to administer the unemployment insurance program and to pay expenses incurred by job service North Dakota which are not payable with federal grant or state general funds. The federal advance interest payment fund must maintain a minimum balance to pay interest due on advances to the state trust fund. The minimum balance must be calculated annually by multiplying the average calendar year benefits paid for the preceding five completed calendar years by one percent. The federal advance interest repayment fund may drop below the annual minimum balance only if payment is required on interest due on advances to the state trust fund.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 539, § 2; 1985, ch. 543, § 6; 1987, ch. 597, § 1; 1993, ch. 495, § 2; 1995, ch. 480, § 8; 2001, ch. 42, § 5; 2007, ch. 444, § 1; 2009, ch. 445, § 1; 2017, ch. 357, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 445, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 444, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

52-04-23.
Financing benefits paid to employees of Indian tribes.

Benefits based on service in employment with an Indian tribe are payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law.

Indian tribes or tribal units, subdivisions, subsidiaries, or business enterprises wholly owned by the Indian tribe, subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, shall pay contributions under the same terms and conditions as all other subject employers, unless it elects to pay into the state unemployment fund amounts equal to the amount of benefits attributable to service in the employ of the Indian tribe.

Indian tribes electing to make payments in lieu of contributions must make such election in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided in sections 52-04-18 and 52-04-19.1. Indian tribes may determine if reimbursement for benefits paid will be elected by the tribe as a whole, by individual tribal units, or by combinations of individual tribal units.

Indian tribes or tribal units must be billed for the full amount of benefits attributable to service in the employ of the Indian tribe or tribal unit on the same schedule as other employing units that have elected to make payments in lieu of contributions.

An Indian tribe or tribal unit that elects to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions must, within thirty days after the effective date of its election, execute and file with the bureau a surety bond approved by the bureau.

Failure of the Indian tribe or tribal unit to make required payments, including assessments of interest and penalty, within ninety days of receipt of the bill causes the Indian tribe to lose the option to make payments in lieu of contributions, as described in subsection 2, for the following tax year unless payment in full is received before contribution rates for the next tax year are computed.

An Indian tribe that loses the option to make payments in lieu of contributions due to late payment or nonpayment, as described in subdivision a, is entitled to have the option reinstated if, after a period of one year, all contributions have been made timely, provided no contributions, payments in lieu of contributions for benefits paid, penalties, or interest remain outstanding.

Failure of the Indian tribe or any tribal unit thereof to make required payments, including assessments of interest and penalty, after all collection activities deemed necessary by the bureau have been exhausted, causes services performed for the tribe to not be treated as employment for purposes of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01.

The bureau may determine that an Indian tribe that loses coverage under subdivision c may have services performed for the tribe again included as employment, for purposes of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01 if all contributions, payments in lieu of contributions, penalties, and interest have been paid.

The bureau will notify the United States internal revenue service and the United States department of labor of a termination or reinstatement of coverage made under subdivisions c and d.

Notices of payment and reporting delinquency to Indian tribes or their tribal units must include information that failure to make full payment within the prescribed time frame:

Will cause the Indian tribe to be liable for taxes under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act;

Will cause the Indian tribe to lose the option to make payments in lieu of contributions; and

May cause the Indian tribe to be excepted from the definition of employer, as provided in subsection 15 of section 52-01-01, and services in the employ of the Indian tribe, as provided in subsection 17 of section 52-01-01, to be excepted from employment.

Benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of an Indian tribe must be financed as provided in section 52-04-19.1.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 449, § 3.

52-04-24.
Staffing services — Payment of unemployment insurance taxes.

If a staffing service exclusively provides temporary staffing services, the staffing service is considered to be the employee’s employer and the staffing service shall pay unemployment insurance taxes at the staffing service’s unemployment insurance tax rate. If a staffing service provides temporary and long-term employee staffing services, the staffing service is subject to the reporting and tax requirements associated with the type of employee provided to the client company.

For the purposes of long-term employee staffing services provided by a staffing service, the staffing service shall:

Report quarterly the wages of all employees furnished to each client company and pay taxes on those wages at the client company’s unemployment insurance tax rate, except as otherwise provided under subsection 3.

Maintain complete and separate records of the wages paid to employees furnished to each of the client companies. Claims for benefits must be separately identified by the staffing service for each client company.

Notify the agency of each client company’s name and unemployment insurance account number and the date the staffing service began providing services to the client company. The staffing service shall provide the agency with the information required under this subdivision upon entering an agreement with a client company, but no later than fifteen days from the effective date of the written agreement.

Supply the agency with a copy of the agreement between the staffing service and the client company.

Notify the agency upon termination of any agreement with a client company, but no later than fifteen days from the effective date of the termination.

Share employer responsibilities with the client company, including retention of the authority to hire, terminate, discipline, and reassign employees. If the contractual agreement between the staffing service and a client company is terminated, the employees become the sole employees of the client company.

For the purposes of long-term employee staffing services provided by a staffing service, upon authorization of the agency, the staffing service may be considered to be the employee’s employer and the staffing service shall pay unemployment insurance taxes at the staffing service’s unemployment insurance tax rate. The agency may not make an authorization under this subsection unless one of the following requirements is met:

In the case of a client company unemployment insurance tax rate that is higher than the staffing services tax rate:

The staffing service:

Calculates the difference between the staffing service’s tax rate and the client company’s tax rate;

Applies the difference to the wages to be earned by the employees furnished to the client company in the following completed calendar quarter; and

Notifies the agency that such application would, if the staffing service’s tax rate were applied to those same wages, cause a reduction in the tax due on those wages which does not exceed five hundred dollars.

If the reduction under paragraph 1 exceeds five hundred dollars, at the written request of the staffing service, the agency may make a written determination that it is appropriate to allow the staffing service to use the staffing service’s unemployment insurance tax rate. The agency shall respond to a request under this paragraph within fifteen days of receiving all required information.

The staffing service includes in its contract with the client company a requirement that if the client company’s unemployment insurance tax rate is higher than the staffing service’s tax rate, the client will arrange to make payment to the agency, pursuant to subsection 4 of section 52-04-06, in the amount necessary to cause the client company’s unemployment insurance tax rate should it be recomputed to be determined by the agency to be equivalent to the staffing service’s unemployment insurance tax rate. Before the agency makes an authorization under this subdivision, the agency actually must receive payment of the amount required to cause the determination that the client company has complied with this subdivision.

The staffing service demonstrates to the agency that the staffing service has entered an agreement with a client company that has an unemployment insurance tax rate that is, at the time of execution of the contract, equal to or lower than the staffing service’s tax rate.

If a staffing service enters a contract with a client company that has an unemployment insurance tax rate that is lower than the staffing service’s tax rate, the agency shall determine the following year’s tax rate for the staffing service by calculating a blended reserve ratio using the proportion of that client company’s total wages paid for up to the previous six years to the total wages paid for up to the previous six years for all of that staffing service’s client companies whose furnished workers are considered the staffing service’s employees for unemployment insurance tax purposes pursuant to subsection 3.

Both a staffing service and client company are considered employers for the purposes of this title. Both parties to a contract between a staffing service and a client company are jointly liable for delinquent unemployment insurance taxes, and the agency may seek to collect such delinquent taxes, and any penalties and interest due, from either party. The agency shall send notices of rate determinations annually to the staffing service. This chapter does not modify or impair any other provisions of the contract between the staffing service and the client company not relating to the requirements of this subsection concerning liability for payment of taxes on the wages paid to workers furnished by the staffing service to the client company, and the means of determining the tax rate to be applied to those wages. Any report that relates to the Federal Unemployment Tax Act [68A Stat. 439; 26 U.S.C. 3301 et seq.] which is required to be submitted to the federal internal revenue service regarding a staffing service must be submitted with the employer identification number of the staffing service.

The agency shall determine whether a person is a staffing service. If the agency determines a person is a staffing service, the agency may further determine if the person is a temporary staffing service. The agency’s determination must be issued in writing, and within fifteen days of the date of issuance of that determination, a person aggrieved by that determination may appeal that determination. The appeal must be heard in the same manner and with the same possible results as all other administrative appeals under this title. In making a determination under this subsection, the agency may consider:

The number of client companies with which the staffing service has contracts;

The length of time the staffing service has been in existence;

The extent to which the staffing service extends services to the general public;

The degree to which the client company and the staffing services are separate and unrelated business entities;

The repetition of officers and managers between the client company and staffing service;

The scope of services provided by the staffing service;

The relationship between the staffing service and the client company’s workers;

The written agreement between the staffing service and the client company; and

Any other factor determined relevant by the agency.

The agency may require information from any staffing service, including a list of current client company accounts, staffing assignments, and wage information. A client company shall provide any information requested by the agency regarding any staffing service.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 456, § 2; 2009, ch. 446, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 446, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.